Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Article 1. In General

§ 29-7-101.
Persons entitled to lien; exception.

Any person is entitled to a lien on any goods, chattels or animals for his reasonable charges for work or services performed or feed provided when he:

Makes, alters, repairs, bestows work upon, transports, stores or keeps the same; or

Feeds, herds, pastures or cares for any domestic or wild animal lawfully held in captivity. Any person creating a lien under this paragraph shall file the lien in the office of the secretary of state.

W.S.

29-7-101

through

29-7-106

shall not apply where a lien is provided by W.S.

29-7-301

and 34.1-7-209. A person engaging in self-storage operations whereby members of the public rent space from the person to store goods and chattels and retain control over access to the goods and chattels is not a warehouseman under W.S. 34.1-7-102(a)(xiii) and is entitled to a lien under this section. A towing and recovery service as defined in W.S. 31-13-101(a)(xiv) is not a warehouse under W.S. 34.1-7-102(a)(xiii) and is entitled to a lien under this section.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 89, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

29-7-101

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2004, ch. 24, § 1; 2021 ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a)(ii), added the last sentence.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, added the last sentence of (b).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence of (b), deleted "34.1-7-209 and" preceding "29 7 301," added "and 34.1-7-209" and substituted "34.1-7-102(a)(xiii)" for "34.1-7-102(a)(viii)" in the second sentence.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Right to lien inconsistent with conversion. —

Verdict finding a rancher liable for conversion of a beefalo herd was inconsistent with a verdict entitling the rancher to a lien against the same property, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

29-7-101

et seq., for feeding the herd because the existence of the lien depended on the rancher's rightful possession of the subject property. McTiernan v. Jellis, 2013 WY 151, 316 P.3d 1153,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 2013).

Legislative history of this chapter. —

See Minnehoma Fin. Co. v. Pauli, 565 P.2d 835,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1977).

Lien is statutory. —

There was no common-law lien for storage and, therefore, such a lien can only be acquired by statute. Minnehoma Fin. Co. v. Pauli, 565 P.2d 835,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1977).

Owner may not impose lien. —

Under the plain and ordinary language contained in subsection (a) of this section and § 29-7-106(a), only a third-party creditor, and not the owner, may impose a lien upon the secured property. Coones v. FDIC, 894 P.2d 613,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1995).

Under this section, implied request to store may give rise to valid storage lien,

and such an implied request arises when the owner of goods abandons such goods on the property of another. Minnehoma Fin. Co. v. Pauli, 565 P.2d 835,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1977).

Mobile home park operator is entitled to storage lien on mobile home which is abandoned

on his property by a tenant. Minnehoma Fin. Co. v. Pauli, 565 P.2d 835,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1977).

Landlord not entitled to lien for past due rent. —

Sections

29-7-101

through

29-7-106

do not entitle a landlord to a lien for past rent due on the personal property of its tenant, or that of a third party, located on the rented premises. Sheridan Commercial Park v. Briggs, 848 P.2d 811,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1993).

Quoted

in

Rocky Mt. Turbines, Inc. v. 660 Syndicate, Inc., 623 P.2d 758,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1981).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability to pay for allegedly unauthorized repairs to motor vehicle, 5 ALR4th 311.

§ 29-7-102.
Right of possession by lien claimant; termination thereof; removal of property without lienholder's consent; penalty therefor; filing of lien statement in lieu of possession.

A lien claimant may retain possession of the property to which the lien pertains until paid for the labor, services, materials and feed which entitle the lien claimant to assert the lien. However, the right of possession terminates six (6) months after the date upon which the charges become due and payable unless the lien claimant has commenced proceedings to foreclose the lien as provided by W.S.

29-7-101

through

29-7-106

.

If any person causes to be removed from the possession of a lien claimant any property or part thereof which is subject to the lien created by W.S.

29-7-101

through

29-7-106

from the place where the property was located when the lien is perfected, without the written consent of the owner and the holder of the lien or his agent, either originally or by transfer, the person so removing the property affected by the lien is guilty of a misdemeanor. On conviction he may be punished by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).

If a lien claimant desires to continue a lien without retaining possession, he may before voluntarily releasing possession file a lien statement in the office of the county clerk of the county where the property is located, or in the case of a feeder’s lien under paragraph (a)(ii) of this section, in the office of the secretary of state.

If possession is terminated without the lien claimant’s consent, he may perfect the lien by filing a lien statement on or before thirty (30) days after possession is terminated.

For a vehicle subject to a lien under this title:

Within thirty (30) days from the date payment is due, the lien claimant shall send by certified mail, return receipt requested, to their last known address a notice of the intent to file, enforce and foreclose a lien to all persons known to claim an interest in the vehicle. The notice shall include:

The information required under W.S. 29-7-105(b);

The information required under W.S. 29-1-312(b); and

The make, year, model, license plate number and state indicator if available, and vehicle identification number.

The duration of collectable storage fees shall not exceed one hundred eighty (180) days from the date service was completed unless notice of intent to file a lien was sent pursuant to this subsection and action to enforce and foreclose the lien has commenced;

“Vehicle” means as defined in W.S. 31-13-101(a)(ix).

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 89, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

29-7-102

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2004, ch. 24, § 1; 2021 ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (c), added “or in the case of a feeder's lien under paragraph (a)(ii) of this section, in the office of the secretary of state” at the end.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (e).

Quoted

in

Rocky Mt. Turbines, Inc. v. 660 Syndicate, Inc., 623 P.2d 758,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1981); Bosler v. Shuck, 714 P.2d 1231,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 492

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 29-7-103.
Lien statement; additional contents; county clerk to note lien on certificate of title.

A lien statement under W.S.

29-7-101

through

29-7-106

shall provide in addition to the requirements of W.S. 29-1-312(b) whether the lien claimant was in possession of the property at the time the lien statement was filed or the owner consented to the filing of the lien. Notwithstanding W.S. 29-1-312(a), a feeder’s lien created pursuant to W.S.

29-7-101

(a)(ii) shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state together with any applicable filing fees.

A lien statement relating to a motor vehicle or other property, title to which is evidenced by a certificate of title, shall not be valid as to the motor vehicle or property unless the county clerk concurrently with the filing of the lien statement places on the certificate of title an appropriate notation showing the date, the amount of the lien and the name of the lien claimant. Each notation under this subsection after the first shall be accompanied by a fee of one dollar ($1.00) paid to the county clerk. If the county clerk issues the certificate of title, he shall immediately endorse the same encumbrance data on the certificate copy on file in his office. If the certificate is issued in some other county or state the county clerk shall promptly transmit to the state or county officer who issued the certificate of title the same encumbrance data. The other county officer shall promptly place the data on the certificate copy on file in his office.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 89, § 3; W.S. 1977, §

29-7-103

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 1993, ch. 192, § 1; 2004, ch. 24, § 1; ch. 130, § 1; 2010, ch. 92, § 2.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 24, § 1, effective July 1, 2004, in (a), substituted “W.S. 29-1-301(b)” for “W.S. 29-1-301(a),” and added the last sentence.

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 130, § 1, in (a) substituted “29-1-301(b)” for “29-1-301(a),”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), substituted “W.S. 29-1-312(b)” for “W.S. 29-1-301(b)” and “W.S. 29-1-312(a)” for “W.S. 29-1-301(a).”

Editor's notes. —

See the conflicting legislation note below. This section has been set out incorporating changes made by both 2004 acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Quoted

in

Rocky Mt. Turbines, Inc. v. 660 Syndicate, Inc., 623 P.2d 758,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1981).

§ 29-7-104.
Termination of lien; effect thereof on claimant's right of possession.

A lien under W.S.

29-7-101

through

29-7-106

terminates:

Upon a lienor’s voluntary surrender of possession of the property, unless a lien statement has previously been filed as provided in W.S.

29-7-103

;

One hundred eighty (180) days after the date upon which the work, services, materials and feed giving rise to the lien were performed or furnished unless a lien statement has previously been filed as provided by W.S.

29-7-103

; and

One hundred eighty (180) days after a lien statement is filed as provided in W.S. 29-7-103, unless action to enforce and foreclose the lien has commenced.

Upon termination of a lien, the lien claimant has no further right to possession of the property and no further interest therein.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 89, § 4; W.S. 1977, §

29-7-104

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2.

This section fails to define when storage charges “become due and payable,”

and the supreme court will not read into the statute an arbitrary time limit. Minnehoma Fin. Co. v. Pauli, 565 P.2d 835,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1977).

Storage is continuing service. —

Storage, unlike the performance of specific services, is a continuing service. In other words, the service does not terminate merely because charges for it have accrued. Minnehoma Fin. Co. v. Pauli, 565 P.2d 835,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1977).

Quoted

in

Rocky Mt. Turbines, Inc. v. 660 Syndicate, Inc., 623 P.2d 758,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

Coones v. FDIC, 848 P.2d 783,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Loss of garageman's lien on repaired vehicle by owner's use of vehicle, 74 ALR4th 90.

§ 29-7-105.
Repossession; enforcement of lien by sale; notice thereof to known claimants; satisfaction by any claimant; title of good faith purchaser; disposition of proceeds; additional creditors' rights; liability for noncompliance with section; “commercially reasonable”.

Subject to the termination of a lien as provided in W.S.

29-7-104

, a lienor who has surrendered possession involuntarily has the right to repossess the property subject to the lien. In repossessing a lienor may proceed without judicial process if this can be done without breach of the peace. A lienor may also replevy the property or use any other judicial action available.

A lien arising under W.S.

29-7-101

through

29-7-106

may be enforced by public or private sale of the property en bloc or in parcels at a time or place and on terms which are commercially reasonable after mailing by certified mail, return receipt requested, to their last known address a notice to all persons known to claim an interest in the property. The notification shall include:

A statement of the amount due;

The nature of the proposed sale; and

The time and place of any public sale.

Before any sale pursuant to this section any person claiming a right in the property may pay the amount necessary to satisfy the lien and the reasonable expenses incurred under this section.

The lien claimant may buy at any public sale pursuant to this section.

A purchaser in good faith of property sold to enforce a lien under W.S.

29-7-101

through

29-7-106

takes the property free of any rights of persons against whom the lien was valid, despite noncompliance by the lien claimant with the requirements of this section.

A lien claimant may satisfy his lien from the proceeds of any sale pursuant to this section but shall hold the balance, if any, for delivery on demand to the owner of the property or any person entitled thereto. The owner or any other person demanding delivery of the balance shall furnish to the lien claimant reasonable evidence of his right to take delivery.

The rights provided by W.S.

29-7-101

through

29-7-106

shall be in addition to all other rights allowed by law to a creditor against his debtor.

A lien under W.S.

29-7-101

through

29-7-106

may also be enforced in accordance with the procedure set forth in W.S. 34.1-7-210(b).

A lien claimant is liable for damages caused by failure to comply with this section.

The fact a better price could be obtained by a sale at a different time or in a different method from that selected by the lien claimant is not sufficient to establish a sale as not made in a commercially reasonable manner.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 89, § 5; W.S. 1977, §

29-7-105

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), substituted “en bloc” for “in bloc.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Attorney fees not authorized by this section. —

When the court issued a writ of replevin requiring appellee to relinquish possession of a vehicle previously purchased by appellant, the court did not abuse its discretion in denying appellant's request for attorney fees because Wyoming follows the American rule and the legislature has elected not to include attorney fees with an award of damages for a violation of this section.
Dave v. Valdez, 2012 WY 59, 275 P.3d 485,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 2012).

Stated

in

Minnehoma Fin. Co. v. Pauli, 565 P.2d 835,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1977).

Cited

in

Katona v. City of Cheyenne, 686 F. Supp. 287, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 4215 (D. Wyo. 1988).

§ 29-7-106.
Priority of lien.

A lien pursuant to W.S.

29-7-101

through

29-7-106

except as otherwise specifically provided therein shall be prior to all other liens, encumbrances and security interests if the property claimed is in possession of the lien claimant.

If the property is not in possession of the lien claimant, a lien under W.S.

29-7-101

through

29-7-106

shall be prior to all other liens, encumbrances and security interests, except for a subsequent lien claimant in possession under W.S.

29-7-101

through

29-7-106

or a lien created under W.S.

29-8-102

relating to liens for the production of farm products under contracts executed, entered into, renewed or substantively amended after July 1, 2001.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 89, § 6; W.S. 1977, §

29-7-106

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2001, ch. 126, § 2.

Owner may not impose lien. —

Under the plain and ordinary language contained in § 29-7-101(a) and subsection (a) of this section, only a third-party creditor, and not the owner, may impose a lien upon the secured property. Coones v. FDIC, 894 P.2d 613,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1995).